Washington statutes.
RCW 7.68.150

Benefits, payments and costs to be funded and accounted for separately.

All benefits and payments made, and all administrative costs accrued, pursuant to this chapter shall be funded and accounted for separate from the other operations and responsibilities of the department.

[ 1973 1st ex.s. c 122 s 15.]